Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-153
Joint service agreements.

When two or more telecommunications companies jointly furnish interexchange service or extended area service, the revenue from such jointly furnished service shall be divided in such manner as may be agreed upon by the telecommunications companies furnishing such service. In the event of inability to agree, any one of the telecommunications companies jointly furnishing such service may file an application with the commission requesting that the commission enter an order prescribing an equitable division of revenue from such jointly furnished service.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 52.